Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Chapter 19 Determination of Death

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

40A Am. Jur. 2d Homicide §§ 236 to 475.

§ 35-19-101.
Determination of death.

An individual who has sustained either irreversible cessation of circulatory and respiratory functions, or irreversible cessation of all functions of the entire brain including the brain stem, is dead. A determination of death shall be made in accordance with accepted medical standards.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 101, § 1; 1985, ch. 223, § 2.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Homicide by causing victim's brain-dead condition, 42 ALR4th 742.

When is death “instantaneous” for purposes of wrongful death or survival action, 75 ALR4th 151.

§ 35-19-102.
Uniformity of construction and application.

The Uniform Determination of Death Act [§§

35-19-101

through

35-19-103

] shall be applied and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of the act among states enacting it.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 223, § 1.

§ 35-19-103.
Short title.

This act, W.S.

35-19-101

through

35-19-103

, may be cited as the “Uniform Determination of Death Act.”

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 223, § 1.